Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 65 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "backyard chicken":
(a) Means a domesticated hen kept on residential property for personal egg
production or educational purposes; and
(b) Does not mean a domesticated hen used for commercial farming or a
domesticated rooster.
(2) A city, urban-county government, charter county government, consolidated local
government, or unified local government:
(a) Shall not enact or enforce any ordinance, zoning regulation, or policy that
directly or indirectly prohibits a person from keeping six (6) or fewer
backyard chickens on any residential property; and
(b) May enact and enforce reasonable ordinances, regulations, or policies to
ensure the health, safety, and welfare of residents, including but not limited
to:
1. Requiring setbacks for coops holding backyard chickens from
property lines and neighboring residences;
2. Requiring sanitation and maintenance standards relating to backyard
chickens to control odors and pests; and
3. Prohibiting the commercial sale of eggs or backyard chickens on
residential properties.
(3) Any ordinance, regulation, or policy that conflicts with this section shall be void
and unenforceable.
Page 1 of 1
BR160800.100 - 1608 - XXXX 2/5/2026 3:00 PM Jacketed